California statutes. Insurance Code
(f) A licensed collection agency or an employee thereof acting within the scope of employment, while making an investigation incidental to the business of the agency, including an investigation of the location of a debtor or the debtor’s property if the contract with an assignor creditor is for the collection of claims owed or due or asserted to be owed or due or the equivalent thereof.

(g) Admitted insurers and agents and insurance brokers licensed by the state, performing duties in connection with insurance transacted by them.

(h) The legal owner of personal property that has been sold under a conditional sales agreement or a mortgagee under the terms of a chattel mortgage.

(i) A bank subject to the jurisdiction of the Commissioner of Financial Institutions of the State of California under Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) of the Financial Code or the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States.

(j) A person engaged solely in the business of securing information about persons or property from public records.

(k) A building contractor, engineer, technical expert, or other person who is engaged by an insurer or licensed adjuster to provide an expert or professional evaluation of the extent, cause, or origin of damage to the insured property, but who does not otherwise participate in the process of adjusting claims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 502, Sec. 3.   (SB 240)   Effective October 3, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14022.5.

(a) In the event of an emergency situation as declared by the commissioner, claims arising out of the emergency, catastrophe, disaster, or other similar occurrence may be adjusted by a nonlicensed adjuster upon registration with the commissioner if all of the following requirements are met: 

(1) The work performed by the nonlicensed adjuster is under the active direction, control, charge, or management of a licensed adjuster or an insurer authorized to do business in this state. 

(2) The licensee or insurer registers the nonlicensed adjuster with the commissioner
 no later than 15 calendar days from the date on which the nonlicensed adjuster began claims adjusting activity in California.

(3) The nonlicensed adjuster submits to the commissioner a certification in a form or other format specified by the commissioner, under penalty of perjury, that the adjuster has read and understands the most recent notice and the handbook for adjusting disaster claims prepared by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14046.

(b) “Registration” or “register,” within the meaning of this section,
 means filing with the commissioner a notice in a form or other format specified by the commissioner, submitted by the supervising licensed adjuster or admitted insurer, naming the nonlicensed adjusters, identifying their adjuster licenses held in other jurisdictions, or, if not licensed, providing other identification specified by the commissioner, stating when their claims adjusting activity will commence or has commenced, and any other information the commissioner may require.

(c) Registration for claims adjusting activities arising out of an emergency is valid for a period of 180 days from the date of the registration letter. Before the lapse of that period, the commissioner may grant further 180-day extensions as the commissioner deems appropriate upon written request from the supervising licensed adjuster or the admitted insurer.

(d) A registration is not valid unless a current certification is on file with the commissioner.

(e) In enforcing this chapter, the department shall not be required to investigate the employment or contractor status of a person registered pursuant to this section.

(f) This section does not apply to a nonlicensed adjuster who meets the criteria described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 502, Sec. 4.   (SB 240)   Effective October 3, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14023.

An application for a license under this chapter shall be on a form prescribed by the commissioner and accompanied by the application fee provided by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 502, Sec. 5.   (SB 240)   Effective October 3, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14024.

An application shall be verified and shall include:

(a) The full name and business address of the applicant.

(b) The name under which applicant intends to do business.

(c) A statement as to the general nature of the business in which the applicant intends to engage.

(d) A statement as to the classification or classifications under which the applicant desires to be qualified.

(e) If the applicant is a person other than an individual, the full name and residence address of each of its partners, officers, and directors, and its manager.

(f) Two recent photographs of the applicant, of a type prescribed by the commissioner, and two classifiable sets of his or her fingerprints.

(g) A verified statement of his or her experience qualifications.

(h) Such other information, evidence, statements, or documents as may be required by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14025.

Before an application for a license is granted, the applicant, or his or her manager, shall meet all of the following:

(a) Be at least 18 years of age.

(b) Not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) Shall have had at least two years of experience in adjusting insurance claims or the equivalent thereof as determined by the commissioner.

(d) Comply with such other qualifications as the commissioner may fix by rule.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14026.

The commissioner may require an applicant, or his or her manager, to demonstrate his or her qualifications by a written or oral examination, or a combination of both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14026.5.

Where a person who is or has been licensed under this chapter has been found by the commissioner to have violated any provision of this code that would justify the suspension or revocation of a license held by the person, or where a person is applying for a license under this chapter and there exists grounds for the denial of the application by the commissioner, the commissioner may, after hearing, revoke the license held or deny the application for an unrestricted license, and in lieu thereof issue to the person a restricted license. The commissioner may impose any reasonable conditions upon the acquisition of the restricted license or conduct of the holder of the license. The holder of the restricted license has no property right in it and the commissioner may, with or without either hearing or cause, suspend or revoke a restricted license. If a hearing is held under this section, it shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The holder of a restricted license is subject to all the provisions of this code and the license shall be kept in force and renewed in the same manner, at the same time, and subject to the same conditions and fees as are applicable to an unrestricted license to act in the same capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 707, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 707.)
-------------------------------------------

14027.

Payment of the application fee prescribed by this chapter entitles an applicant, or his or her manager, to one examination without further charge. If the person fails to pass the examination, he or she shall not be eligible for any subsequent examination except upon payment of the reexamination fee prescribed by this chapter for each such subsequent examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14028.

After a hearing the commissioner may deny a license unless the application makes a showing satisfactory to the commissioner that the applicant, if an individual, has not, or if the applicant is a person other than an individual, that its manager and each of its officers and partners have not:

(a) Committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) Been refused a license under this chapter or had a license revoked.

(c) Been an officer, partner, or manager of any person who has been refused a license under this chapter or whose license has been revoked.

(d) While unlicensed committed, or aided and abetted the commission of, any act for which a license is required by this chapter.

(e) Committed any act or crime constituting grounds for denial of license under Section 1668.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 448, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14028.5.

The commissioner may, without hearing, deny a license if the applicant has committed any act or crime constituting grounds for denial of license under Section 1669.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 448, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14029.

(a) The business of each licensee shall be operated under the active direction, control, charge, or management of the licensee, if the licensee is qualified, or the person who has qualified to act as the licensee’s manager, if the licensee is not qualified.

(b) No person shall act as a manager of a licensee until he or she has complied with each of the following:

(1) Demonstrated his or her qualifications by a written or oral examination, or a combination of both, if required by the commissioner.

(2) Made a satisfactory showing to the commissioner that he or she has the qualifications prescribed by Section 14025 and that none of the facts stated in Section 14028 or 14028.5 exist as to him or her.

(c) If the manager, who has qualified as provided in this section, ceases for any reason whatsoever to be connected with the licensee to whom the license is issued, the licensee shall notify the commissioner in writing 30 days from the cessation. If notice is given, the license shall remain in force for a reasonable length of time to be determined by the rules of the commissioner pending the qualifications, as provided in this chapter, of another manager. If the licensee fails to notify the commissioner within the 30-day period, his or her license shall be subject to suspension or revocation and may be reinstated only upon the filing of an application for reinstatement, payment of the reinstatement fee, if any is due, and the qualification of a manager as provided herein.

(d) Every manager shall renew his or her authority by satisfying the requirements of Article 8 (commencing with Section 14090).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 300, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14030.

Whenever the individual on the basis of whose qualifications a license under this chapter has been obtained ceases to be connected with the licensee for any reason whatever, the business may be carried on for such temporary period and under such terms and conditions as the commissioner shall provide by regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14031.

Whenever a hearing is held under this chapter to determine whether an application for a license should be granted or to determine the qualifications of a licensee’s manager, the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11501) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14032.

The form and content of the license shall be determined by the commissioner in accordance with Section 164 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14033.

The license shall at all times be posted in a conspicuous place in the principal place of business of the licenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14034.

Upon the issuance of a license, a pocket card of such size, design, and content as may be determined by the commissioner shall be issued without charge to each licensee, if an individual, or if the licensee is a person other than an individual, to its manager and to each of its officers and partners, which card shall be evidence that the licensee is duly licensed pursuant to this chapter. When any person to whom a card is issued terminates his or her position, office, or association with the licensee, the card shall be surrendered to the licensee and within five days thereafter shall be mailed or delivered by the licensee to the department for cancellation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14035.

A licensee shall, within 30 days after such change, notify the department of any change of his or her address and of any change in the officers or partners of such licensee. The principal place of business may be at a home or at a business address, but it shall be the place at which the licensee maintains a permanent office.

Applications, on forms prescribed by the commissioner, shall be submitted by all new officers or partners. The commissioner may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter if he or she determines that at the time the person became an officer or partner of a licensee, any of the facts stated in Section 14028 or 14028.5 existed as to such person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 448, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14036.

A license issued under this chapter is not assignable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14037.

A licensee shall at all times be legally responsible for the good conduct in the business of each of the licensee’s employees or agents, including the licensee’s manager and any nonlicensed adjusters the licensee registers pursuant to Section 14022.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 502, Sec. 6.   (SB 240)   Effective October 3, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14038.

(a) Any licensee or officer, director, partner, or manager of a licensee may divulge to any law enforcement officer or district attorney, or to his or her representative, any information he or she may acquire as to any criminal offense, but he or she shall not divulge to any other person, except as he or she may be required by law to do so, any information acquired by him or her except at the direction of the employer or client for whom the information was obtained. 

(b) No licensee or officer, director, partner, manager, or employee of a licensee shall knowingly make any false report to his or her employer or client for whom information was being obtained.

(c) No written report shall be submitted to a client except by the licensee, qualifying manager, or a person authorized by one or either of them, and such person submitting the report shall exercise diligence in ascertaining whether or not the facts and information in such a report are true and correct.

(d) No licensee, or officer, director, partner, manager, or employee of a licensee shall use a badge in connection with the official activities of the licensee’s business.

(e) No licensee, or officer, director, partner, manager, or employee of a licensee, shall use a title, or wear a uniform, or use an insignia, or use an identification card, or make any statement with the intent to give an impression that he or she is connected in any way with the federal government, a state government, or any political subdivision of a state government.

(f) No licensee, or officer, director, partner, manager, or employee of a licensee, shall enter any private building or portion thereof without the consent of the owner or of the person in legal possession thereof.

(g) No licensee shall appear as an assignee party in any proceeding involving claim and delivery, replevin, or other possessory action, action to foreclose a chattel mortgage, mechanic’s lien, materialman’s lien, or any other lien.

(h) No licensee shall permit an employee or agent in his or her own name to advertise, engage clients, furnish reports, or present bills to clients, or in any manner whatever to conduct business for which a license is required under this chapter. All business of the licensee shall be conducted in the name of and under the control of the licensee.

(i) No licensee acting as an independent automobile damage appraiser or adjuster or as an automobile insurance claims adjuster, appraiser or representative shall receive any financial benefit from an automobile repair facility. “Financial benefit” means the receiving of any commission or gratuity, discount on repair costs, free repairs, employment by a repair facility, or possession of more than 3 percent direct ownership in an automobile repair facility located in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14039.

No person licensed as an insurance adjuster shall do any of the following:

(a) Fail to disclose his or her full financial interest in a contract or agreement executed by him or her for the adjustment of a claim prior to the execution thereof.

(b) Use any misrepresentation to solicit a contract or agreement to adjust a claim.

(c) Solicit or accept remuneration from, or have a financial interest exceeding 3 percent in, any salvage, repair, or other firm, which obtains business in connection with any claim which he or she has a contract or agreement to adjust.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14040.

Any badge or cap insignia worn by a person who is a licensee, officer, director, partner, manager, or employee of a licensee shall be of a design approved by the commissioner, and shall bear on its face a distinctive word indicating the name of the licensee and an employee number by which such person may be identified by the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14041.

Each licensee shall maintain a record containing such information relative to his or her employees as may be prescribed by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14042.

A licensee shall not conduct a business under a fictitious or other business name unless and until he or she has obtained the written authorization of the commissioner to do so.

The commissioner shall not authorize the use of a fictitious or other business name that is so similar to that of a public officer or agency or of that used by another licensee that the public may be confused or misled thereby.

The authorization shall require, as a condition precedent to the use of any fictitious name, that the licensee comply with Section 1724.5 of this code and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17900) of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

A licensee desiring to
 conduct his or her business under more than one fictitious business name shall obtain the authorization of the commissioner in the manner prescribed in this section for the use of each name.

The licensee shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each authorization to use an additional fictitious business name and for each change in the use of a fictitious business name. If the original license is issued in a nonfictitious name and authorization is requested to have the license reissued in a fictitious business name, the licensee shall pay a fee of twenty-nine dollars ($29) for that authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 92.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.

Each licensee shall file with the commissioner the complete address of his or her principal place of business, including the name and number of the street or, if the street where the business is located is not numbered, the number of the post office box. The commissioner may require the filing of other information for the purpose of identifying such principal place of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14044.

Every advertisement by a licensee soliciting or advertising business shall contain his or her name, address, and license number as they appear in the records of the commissioner. The commissioner may adopt regulations defining the term “advertisement” as used in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14045.

A licensee shall not advertise or conduct business from any location other than that shown on the records of the commissioner as his or her principal place of business unless he or she has received a branch office certificate for such location after compliance with the provisions of this chapter and such additional requirements necessary for the protection of the public as the commissioner may by regulation prescribe. A licensee shall notify the commissioner in writing within 10 days after closing or changing the location of a branch office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14046.

(a) (1) The department shall annually prepare and deliver to every person licensed under this chapter and every insurer admitted in this state a notice describing the most significant California laws pertaining to property insurance policies, including those related to a declared state of emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, or other emergency declared by a public official.

(2) The department shall prepare and deliver to every person licensed under this chapter a handbook for adjusting in California that includes information relevant to evaluating damage caused by an emergency, catastrophe, disaster, or other similar occurrence,
 including wildfires. The handbook shall be the similar or equivalent to one hour of continuing education for licensees.

(b) For a claim under a policy of residential property insurance arising as a result of a declared state of
 emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, or other emergency declared by a public official, an insurer shall provide the claimant with a copy of the most recent notice described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) no later than 15 calendar days from the date on which the insurer received notice of the claim.

(c) After a declared state of emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, or other emergency declared by a public official, a supervising licensed adjuster shall require any
 nonlicensed adjuster it has registered with the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14022.5 and any nonlicensed adjuster exempted from this chapter pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14022 to read and understand the most recent notice described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and the most recent handbook described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) no later than 15 calendar days from the date on which the nonlicensed adjuster began claims adjusting activity in California.

(d) The commissioner shall make the notice described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the handbook described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and the certification process required pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14022.5 accessible through a dedicated page on the department’s internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 502, Sec. 7.   (SB 240)   Effective October 3, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14047.

(a) For a claim under a policy of residential property insurance arising as a result of a state of emergency, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 8558 of the Government Code, if, within a six-month period, an insurer assigns a third or subsequent first-party real or personal property claims adjuster to be primarily responsible for a claim, the insurer, in a timely manner, shall provide the insured with a written status report, establish a primary point of contact for the insured, and provide the insured with one or more direct means of communication with the primary point of contact.

(b) The primary point of contact shall be available to respond to inquiries
 by the insured related to the residential property insurance claim. Other claims personnel, vendors, or professionals, including clerical staff members and call center staff members, may work on portions of the insured’s claim. Once assigned, the primary point of contact shall remain assigned to the insured’s claim until the insurer determines that the residential property claim is closed or litigation has been filed.

(c) The insurer shall ensure that the primary point of contact refers and transfers an insured to the appropriate supervisor with
 a span of control over the primary point of contact upon the request of the insured. This process shall be satisfied by a referral to a first-tier or second-tier manager with authority over claim handling.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Policy of residential property insurance” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10087.

(2) “Primary point of contact” means a first-party real or personal property claims adjuster or team employed as a member or members of the insurer’s staff who are knowledgeable about the claim and its current status.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 502, Sec. 8.   (SB 240)   Effective October 3, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bonds [14050. - 14054.]

14050.

(a) A license shall not be issued under this chapter unless the applicant files with the commissioner a surety bond executed by a surety company authorized to do business in the state in the sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000) conditioned for the faithful and honest conduct of business by the applicant. The bond’s form, execution, and sufficiency of the sureties shall be approved by the commissioner.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a surety bond is not required for a licensed insurance adjuster, or an employee of a licensee, who adjusts claims on behalf of, and under the direction of, a licensee who is qualified as a
 manager, as described in Section 14029, and who has filed a surety bond or certificate of insurance. Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a licensed insurance adjuster, an employee of a licensee, or a qualified manager is not required to file a surety bond or certificate of insurance if that licensed insurance adjuster, employee of a licensee, or qualified manager adjusts claims for an association, organization, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation that has filed a surety bond or certificate of insurance.

(2) A surety bond or certificate of insurance filed for the purposes described in paragraph (1) shall provide the names of all licensed insurance adjusters, employees, or qualified managers who may perform duties under that surety bond or certificate of insurance on a form provided by the commissioner. Any changes, removals,
 or additions to the licensed insurance adjusters, employees, or qualified managers listed on the form shall be made within 30 days in the manner required by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 627, Sec. 21.   (AB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14051.

The bond required by this article shall be taken in the name of the people of this state and every person injured by the willful, malicious, or wrongful act of the principal may bring an action on the bond in his or her own name to recover damages suffered by reason of such willful, malicious, or wrongful act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14052.

(a) Every licensee who is required by this article to file a surety bond or a certificate of insurance shall at all times maintain on file the surety bond or certificate required by this
 article in full force and effect and shall maintain the names of all licensed insurance adjusters, employees, or qualified managers who may perform duties under that surety bond or certificate of insurance. If the licensee fails to maintain the surety bond or certificate or the names thereon, their license shall be immediately suspended and shall not be reinstated until an application therefor, in the form prescribed by the commissioner, is filed together with a proper surety bond or certificate.

(b) The commissioner may deny the application notwithstanding the applicant’s compliance with this section:

(1) For any reason that would justify a refusal to issue, or a suspension or revocation of, a license.

(2) For the performance by applicant of any practice while under suspension for failure to keep the bond or certificate in force, for which a license under this article is required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 627, Sec. 22.   (AB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14053.

In lieu of the surety bond required by this article there may be deposited with the State of California the sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000) in cash, or evidence of deposit of the sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000) in banks authorized to do business in this state and insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or investment certificates or share accounts in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) issued by a savings association doing business in this state and insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or evidence of a certificate of funds or share account of the sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000) in a credit union, as defined in Section 14000 of the Financial Code, whose share deposits are guaranteed by the National Credit Union Administration or guaranteed by any other agency approved by the Department of Financial
 Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 199.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14054.

Bonds executed and filed with the commissioner pursuant to this article shall remain in force and effect until the surety has terminated future liability by 30-day notice to the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Disciplinary Proceedings [14060. - 14065.]

14060.

Except as otherwise required to comply with the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 14070), the proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14061.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter or may issue a restricted license in accordance with Section 14026.5 if he or she determines that the licensee, or his or her manager, if an individual, or if the licensee is a person other than an individual, that any of its officers, directors, partners, or its manager, has:

(a) Made any false statement or given any false information in connection with an application for a license or a renewal or reinstatement of a license.

(b) Violated any provisions of this chapter.

(c) Violated any rule of the commissioner adopted pursuant to the authority contained in this chapter.

(d) Been convicted of any crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions and duties of the holder of the registration or license in question.

(e) Impersonated, or permitted or aided and abetted an employee to impersonate a law enforcement officer or employee of the United States of America, or of any state or political subdivision thereof.

(f) Committed or permitted any employee to commit any act, while the license was expired which would be cause for the suspension or revocation of a license, or grounds for the denial of an application for a license.

(g) Willfully failed or refused to render to a client services or a report as agreed between the parties and for which compensation has been paid or tendered in accordance with the agreement of the parties.

(h) Committed assault, battery, or kidnapping, or used force or violence on any person, without proper justification.

(i) Knowingly violated, or advised, encouraged, or assisted the violation of any court order or injunction in the course of business as a licensee.

(j) Acted as a runner or capper for any attorney.

(k) Committed any act which is a ground for denial of an application for license under this chapter.

(l) Purchased, possessed, or transported any tear gas weapon except as authorized by law. A violation of this subdivision may be punished by the suspension of a license for a period to be determined by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 707, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 707.)
-------------------------------------------

14061.5.

The commissioner may, without hearing, suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter, or may issue a restricted license, if he or she determines that the licensee has committed any act or crime constituting grounds for denial of license under Section 14028.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 448, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14062.

The record of conviction, or a certified copy thereof, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction, as that term is used in this article or in Section 14028 or 14028.5.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article or of Section 14028 or 14028.5. The commissioner may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing that
 person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 627, Sec. 23.   (AB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14063.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter or may issue a restricted license in accordance with Section 14026.5 if the commissioner determines that the licensee, or his or her manager, if an individual, or if the licensee is a person other than an individual, that any of its officers, directors, partners, or its manager, has:

(a) Used any letterhead, advertisement, or other printed matter, or in any matter whatever represented that he or she is an instrumentality of the federal government, a state or any political subdivision thereof.

(b) Used a name different from that under which he or she is currently licensed in any advertisement, solicitation, or contract for business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 707, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 707.)
-------------------------------------------

14064.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter or may issue a restricted license in accordance with Section 14026.5 if the commissioner determines that the licensee, or his or her manager, if an individual, or if the licensee is a person other than an individual, that any of its officers, directors, partners, or its manager, has committed any act in the course of the licensee’s business constituting dishonesty or fraud.

“Dishonesty or fraud” as used in this section includes, in addition to other acts not specifically enumerated herein, all of the following:

(a) Knowingly making a false statement relating to evidence or information obtained in the course of employment, or knowingly publishing a slander or a libel in the course of business.

(b) Using illegal means in the collection or attempted collection of a debt or obligation.

(c) Manufacture of evidence.

(d) Acceptance of employment adverse to a client or former client relating to a matter with respect to which the licensee has obtained confidential information by reason of or in the course of his or her employment by such client or former client.

(e) Impersonating, or permitting or aiding and abetting an employee to impersonate a law enforcement officer or employee of the United States of America, or of any state or political subdivision thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 707, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 707.)
-------------------------------------------

14064.5.

(a) The commissioner may, at any time, deny, suspend, or revoke a nonlicensed adjuster’s registration under Section 14022.5, or impose a restricted registration, in the same manner and on the same grounds as the commissioner may for a license as set forth in Sections 14026.5 to 14028.5, inclusive.

(b) The commissioner may deny, suspend, revoke, or restrict an adjusting firm’s license if a nonlicensed adjuster registered by the firm pursuant to Section 14022.5 commits an act that would give rise to suspension, revocation, or restriction of the firm’s license under Section 14038, 14039, or 14061 to 14064, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 502, Sec. 9.   (SB 240)   Effective October 3, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14065.

The commissioner, in lieu of suspending or revoking a license issued under this chapter for violations of Sections 14061, 14063, 14064, and 14064.5, may impose a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) upon a licensee, if the commissioner determines that a penalty better serves the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 502, Sec. 10.   (SB 240)   Effective October 3, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------


